incubator/apertium-pes/dev/apertium-far.far.dix
  	<pardef n="negative__v">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
  	<pardef n="future__v">
    	<e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l/><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ft"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
       </pardef>
	
	<pardef n="clitic__v">
	
		<e><p><l>مت</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
	
	   <e><p><l>مش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>متان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>مشان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>مت</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>مش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>متان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>مشان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
		
		
		<e><p><l>یش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یمان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یشان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یمان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یشان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p2"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
		
		
		<e><p><l>یمت</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یمش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یمشان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یمتان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>یمت</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>یمش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یمشان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>یمتان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p1"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>شان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ت</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>مان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>تان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>شان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
		
		
		<e><p><l>نم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ندت</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ندش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ندمان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ندتان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>ندشان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>

		<e><p><l>ندم</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ندت</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ندش</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objsg"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ندمان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p1"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
	
		<e><p><l>ندتان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p2"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>
		
		<e><p><l>ندشان</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pl"/><s n="p3"/><s n="enc"/><s n="obj"/><s n="p3"/><s n="objpl"/></r></p></e>

	</pardef>
	

	<e lm="روانه نمی‌کرد"><p><l>روانه<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>روانه<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="گره نمی‌کن"><p><l>گره<b/>نمی‌کن</l><r>گره<b/>کن</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="مستقر نمیساخت"><p><l>نمی<b/>مستقر<b/>نمیساخت</l><r>مستقر<b/>ساخت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="‌تأمل نکرد"><p><l>‌تأمل<b/>نکرد</l><r>‌تأمل<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی غر"><p><l>نمی<b/>غر</l><r>غر</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بیان نمی کرد"><p><l>نمی<b/>بیان<b/>نمی کرد</l><r>بیان<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="خجالت نمی کشید"><p><l>خجالت<b/>نمی کشید</l><r>خجالت<b/>کشید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پیدا نمی شد"><p><l>پیدا<b/>نمی شد</l><r>پیدا<b/>شد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بر عهده نمی گرفت"><p><l>بر<b/>عهده<b/>نمی گرفت</l><r>بر<b/>عهده<b/>گرفت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="احضار نکن"><p><l>احضار<b/>نکن</l><r>احضار<b/>کن</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پیاده نمیشد"><p><l>نمی<b/>پیاده<b/>نمیشد</l><r>پیاده<b/>شد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بازگو نمی‌کرد"><p><l>بازگو<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>بازگو<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="تصمیم نگرفت"><p><l>تصمیم<b/>نگرفت</l><r>تصمیم<b/>گرفت</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بیرون نکن"><p><l>بیرون<b/>نکن</l><r>بیرون<b/>کن</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="بیدار نمی‌شد"><p><l>بیدار<b/>نمی‌شد</l><r>بیدار<b/>شد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمیگرفت"><p><l>نمیگرفت</l><r>گرفت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی گرد"><p><l>نمی<b/>گرد</l><r>گرد</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="می یاب"><p><l>می<b/>یاب</l><r>یاب</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی ماند"><p><l>نمی<b/>ماند</l><r>ماند</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نخر"><p><l>نخر</l><r>خر</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="می تاز"><p><l>می<b/>تاز</l><r>تاز</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمیاموز"><p><l>نمیاموز</l><r>آموز</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی‌فشرد"><p><l>نمی‌فشرد</l><r>فشرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="گل اندود نمی‌کرد"><p><l>گل<b/>اندود<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>گل<b/>اندود<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمیکوب"><p><l>نمیکوب</l><r>کوب</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمیایست"><p><l>نمیایست</l><r>ایست</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="سرزنش نکرد"><p><l>سرزنش<b/>نکرد</l><r>سرزنش<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="fel__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نمی مالید"><p><l>نمی<b/>مالید</l><r>مالید</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="کیف نمی‌کرد"><p><l>کیف<b/>نمی‌کرد</l><r>کیف<b/>کرد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="یقین حاصل نکن"><p><l>یقین<b/>حاصل<b/>نکن</l><r>یقین<b/>حاصل<b/>کن</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="ابراز نمی‌داشت"><p><l>ابراز<b/>نمی‌داشت</l><r>ابراز<b/>داشت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پس نمی ده"><p><l>پس<b/>نمی ده</l><r>پس<b/>ده</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="نزدیک نمیکن"><p><l>نزدیک<b/>نمیکن</l><r>نزدیک<b/>کن</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="خلاصه نمی کن"><p><l>خلاصه<b/>نمی کن</l><r>خلاصه<b/>کن</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="منتقل نمیگشت"><p><l>نمی<b/>منتقل<b/>نمیگشت</l><r>منتقل<b/>گشت</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="پاره نمی‌کن"><p><l>پاره<b/>نمی‌کن</l><r>پاره<b/>کن</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="مرتب نمی کن"><p><l>مرتب<b/>نمی کن</l><r>مرتب<b/>کن</r></p><par n="present__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
	<e lm="سوت نمی‌زد"><p><l>سوت<b/>نمی‌زد</l><r>سوت<b/>زد</r></p><par n="past__v"/><par n="imperfect__v"/><par n="negative__v"/></e>
